North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Article 4. Construction and Enlargement of Hospitals.

§ 131E-70.
Construction and enlargement of local hospitals.

The Department is authorized to continue surveys of all counties in the State to determine:

The hospital needs of the county;

The economic ability of various areas to support adequate hospital service;

What assistance by the State, if any, is necessary to supplement other available funds; to finance the construction of new hospitals and health centers, additions to existing hospitals and health centers; and to finance equipment necessary to provide adequate hospital service for the citizens of the county;

and to periodically report this information, together with its recommendations, to the Governor, who shall transmit the reports to the General Assembly for any legislative action necessary to ensure an adequate statewide hospital program.

The Department is authorized to act as the agency of the State to develop and administer a statewide plan in accordance with rules adopted by the Medical Care Commission for the construction and maintenance of hospitals, public health centers and related facilities and to receive and administer funds which may be provided by the General Assembly and by the federal government.

The Department is authorized to develop statewide plans for the construction and maintenance of hospitals, medical centers and related facilities, or other plans necessary in order to meet the requirements and receive the benefits of applicable federal legislation.

The Department is authorized to adopt rules to carry out the intent and purposes of this Article.

The Department shall be responsible for doing all acts necessary to authorize the State to receive the full benefits of any federal statutes enacted for the construction and maintenance of hospitals, health centers or allied facilities.

The Medical Care Commission shall make grants-in-aid to counties, cities, towns and subdivisions of government to acquire real estate and construct hospital facilities, including the reconstruction, remodeling or addition to any hospital facilities acquired by municipalities or subdivisions of government for use as community hospitals. These appropriations and funds made available by the State shall be allocated, apportioned and granted for the purposes of this Article and for other purposes in accordance with the rules adopted by the Medical Care Commission. The Medical Care Commission may furnish financial and other types of aid and assistance to any nonprofit hospital owned and operated by a corporation or association, no part of the net earnings of which inures, or may lawfully inure, to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual, upon the same terms and conditions as this aid and financial assistance is granted to municipalities and subdivisions of government.

The Department may make available to any eligible hospital, clinic, or other medical facility operated by the State any unallocated federal sums or balances remaining after all grants-in-aid for local approvable projects made by the Department have been completed, disbursed or encumbered.

History.

1945, c. 1096; 1947, c. 933, ss. 3, 5; 1949, c. 592; 1951, c. 1183, s. 1; 1971, c. 134; 1973, c. 476, s. 152; c. 1090, s. 1; 1979, c. 504, ss. 8, 14; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Obligation of North Carolina Municipalities and Hospital Authorities to Provide Uncompensated Hospital Care to the Medically Indigent,” see 20 Wake Forest L. Rev. 317 (1984).

§§ 131E-71 through 131E-74.

Reserved for future codification purposes.